Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6036SV (1) 91 mb/jh S.F. 2392 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 280.37 Nonaccredited home school 1 sports organization scrimmages. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âNonaccredited home school sports organizationâ means 4 a team, club, cooperative, or group organized primarily for 5 students receiving competent private instruction or independent 6 private instruction under chapter 299A, or for students 7 receiving instruction in nonaccredited nonpublic settings that 8 are not a member or associate member of an organization. 9 b. âOrganizationâ means the same as defined in section 10 280.13. 11 c. âSchoolâ means a public school district or accredited 12 nonpublic school that is a member or associate member of an 13 organization. 14 d. âScrimmageâ means a noncompetitive, practice-oriented 15 interscholastic event between teams that simulates game 16 conditions solely for the purpose of evaluating and developing 17 team strategies, individual skills, and conditioning. 18 2. Notwithstanding any rule, bylaw, policy, or regulation 19 of an organization, a school may participate in a scrimmage 20 against a nonaccredited home school sports organization in any 21 sport offered by the school. 22 3. a. A scrimmage under this section requires a prior 23 agreement in writing between the school district superintendent 24 or designee of the accredited nonpublic school and a duly 25 authorized representative of the nonaccredited home school 26 sports organization. The agreement shall be retained by the 27 school and nonaccredited home school sports organization for 28 one year following the scrimmage. The agreement shall include 29 all of the following: 30 (1) The date, time, location, duration, and format of the 31 scrimmage. 32 (2) Safety protocols, including concussion management and 33 emergency procedures. 34 (3) Any other conditions determined to be necessary by 35 -1- LSB 6036SV (1) 91 mb/jh 1/ 4 S.F. 2392 either party. 1 b. Each school and nonaccredited home school sports 2 organization shall ensure appropriate liability coverage and 3 assume responsibility for its own participants in a scrimmage 4 under this section. A school or nonaccredited home school 5 sports organization shall not be liable for injuries resulting 6 from a scrimmage except as provided by law or in the written 7 agreement. 8 4. Students participating in a scrimmage on behalf of 9 a nonaccredited home school sports organization under this 10 section shall not be subject to the eligibility rules of an 11 organization. 12 5. A scrimmage under this section shall: 13 a. Not count as a regular season contest or affect win-loss 14 records, standings, rankings, or postseason eligibility. 15 b. Not involve official scorekeeping for public announcement 16 or record purposes. 17 c. Not charge admission to spectators. 18 d. Not use public address announcements for play-by-play 19 commentary. 20 e. Be limited in duration and intensity consistent with 21 preseason or in-season practice rules of the sport, as 22 established by the national federation of state high school 23 associations or another applicable association. 24 f. Occur at a facility owned or controlled by one of the 25 teams or at a neutral facility agreed upon by the teams. 26 g. Officials shall not be compensated unless agreed upon by 27 the teams solely for training or instructional purposes. 28 h. Be voluntary for all participants. 29 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect July 1, 2027. 30